test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kipwnj09_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kipõń: # Noun (9) kipõń 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kipõń+N+Sg+Nom: kipõń
     kipõń+N+Sg+Gen: kibõna
     kipõń+N+Sg+Par: kibõnat
     kipõń+N+Sg+Ill: [kibõnahe, kibõnadõ]
     kipõń+N+Sg+Ine: [kibõnan, kibõnah, kibõnahn]
     kipõń+N+Sg+Ela: kibõnast
     kipõń+N+Sg+All: kibõnalõ
     kipõń+N+Sg+Ade: kibõnal
     kipõń+N+Sg+Abl: kibõnalt
     kipõń+N+Sg+Tra: kibõnas
     kipõń+N+Sg+Ter: kibõnaniq
     kipõń+N+Sg+Abe: kibõnaldaq
     kipõń+N+Sg+Com: kibõnagaq
     kipõń+N+Pl+Nom: kibõnaq
     kipõń+N+Pl+Gen: [kibõnidõ, kibõniidõ]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Par: [kibõnit, kibõniid]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Ill: [kibõnihe, kibõniihe, kibõnidõ, kibõniidõ]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Ine: [kibõnin, kibõnih, kibõnihn, kibõniin, kibõniih, kibõniihn]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Ela: [kibõnist, kibõniist]
     kipõń+N+Pl+All: [kibõnilõ, kibõniilõ]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Ade: [kibõnil, kibõniil]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Abl: [kibõnilt, kibõniilt]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Tra: [kibõnis, kibõniis]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Ter: [kibõniniq, kibõniiniq]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Abe: [kibõnildaq, kibõniildaq]
     kipõń+N+Pl+Com: [kibõnidõgaq, kibõniidõgaq]
